Washington statutes.
RCW 18.57.005

Powers and duties of board.

The board shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To administer examinations to applicants for licensure under this chapter;

(2) To make such rules and regulations as are not inconsistent with the laws of this state as may be deemed necessary or proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(3) To establish and administer requirements for continuing professional education as may be necessary or proper to insure the public health and safety as a prerequisite to granting and renewing licenses under this chapter: PROVIDED, That such rules shall not require a licensee under this chapter to engage in continuing education related to or provided by any specific branch, school, or philosophy of medical practice or its political and/or professional organizations, associations, or societies;

(4) To adopt rules governing the administration of sedation and anesthesia in the offices of persons licensed under this chapter, including necessary training and equipment;

(5) To keep an official record of all its proceedings, which record shall be evidence of all proceedings of the board which are set forth therein.

[ 2007 c 273 s 27; 1986 c 259 s 94; 1979 c 117 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Implementation—2007 c 273: See RCW 70.230.900 and 70.230.901.

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.